Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.180

Special inquiry judge—Disqualification from subsequent proceedings.

The judge serving as a special inquiry judge shall be disqualified from acting as a magistrate or judge in any subsequent court proceeding arising from such inquiry except alleged contempt for neglect or refusal to appear, testify or provide evidence at such inquiry in response to an order, summons or subpoena.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 18.]